Hawaii statutes.
[§200-26] Arrest or citation. (a)
Except when required by state law to take immediately before a district judge a
person arrested for a violation of any provision of this part, including any
rule adopted pursuant to this part, any person authorized to enforce this part,
hereinafter referred to as an enforcement officer, upon arresting a person for
violation of any provision of this part, including any rule adopted pursuant to
this part, in the discretion of the enforcement officer, shall either:

(1) Issue to the purported violator a summons or
citation, printed in the form described, warning the purported violator to
appear and answer to the charge against the purported violator at a certain
place and at a time within seven days after such arrest; or

(2) Take the purported violator without unnecessary
delay before a district judge.

(b) The summons or citation shall be printed
in a form comparable to the form of other summonses and citations used for
arresting offenders and shall be designed to provide for inclusion of all
necessary information. The form and content of such summons or citation shall
be adopted or prescribed by the district courts.

The original of the summons or citation shall
be given to the purported violator and the other copy or copies distributed in
the manner prescribed by the district courts; provided that the district courts
may prescribe alternative methods of distribution for the original and any
other copies.

Summonses and citations shall be consecutively
numbered and the carbon copy or copies of each shall bear the same number.

(c) Any person who fails to appear at the
place and within the time specified in the summons or citation issued to the
person by the enforcement officer, upon the person's arrest for violation of any
provision of this part, including any rule adopted pursuant to this part, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

In the event any person fails to comply with a
summons or citation issued to that person, or if any person fails or refuses to
deposit bail as required, the enforcement officer shall cause a complaint to be
entered against that person and secure the issuance of a warrant for the
person's arrest.

(d) When a complaint is made to any
prosecuting officer of the violation of any provision of this part, including
any rule adopted thereunder, the enforcement officer who issued the summons or
citation shall subscribe to it under oath administered by another official of
the department whose name has been submitted to the prosecuting officer and who
has been designated by the chairperson to administer the same. [L 1991, c 272,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next